Wisconsin, session 2025, SB799.
do enact as follows:SB799,1Section 1. 51.30 (5) (b) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:51.30 (5) (b) 1. The guardian of an individual who is adjudicated incompetent in this state shall have access to the individual’s court and treatment records at all times. The parent, guardian, or person in the place of a parent of a developmentally disabled minor shall have access to the minor’s court and treatment records at all times except in the case of a minor aged 14 or older who files a written objection to such access with the custodian of the records. The parent, guardian, or person in the place of a parent of other minors shall have the same rights of access as provided to subject individuals under this section. Access under this subdivision includes access, at any time, to any electronic version of a minor’s treatment records that is accessible via the Internet.SB799,2Section 2. 51.30 (5) (bm) of the statutes is amended to read:51.30 (5) (bm) Parents denied physical placement who may not access a child’s court or treatment records. A parent who has been denied periods of physical placement with a child under s. 767.41 (4) (b) or 767.451 (4) and the parent of a minor who has been adjudged to be in need of protection or services under s. 48.13 because of an action by the parent or the parent’s failure to act may not have the rights of a parent or guardian under pars. (a) and (b) with respect to access to that child’s court or treatment records.SB799,3Section 3. 62.50 (3) (am) of the statutes is amended to read:62.50 (3) (am) The common council may suspend or modify any policy established under par. (a) only upon a two-thirds unanimous vote of all of the members of the common council.SB799,4Section 4. 146.83 (1d) of the statutes is created to read:146.83 (1d) A health care provider shall grant the parent or guardian of a minor access, at any time, to any electronic version of the minor’s patient health care records that is accessible via the Internet. SB799,5Section 5. 146.835 of the statutes is amended to read:146.835 Parents denied physical placement rights who may not access a child’s patient health care records. A parent who has been denied periods of physical placement under s. 767.41 (4) (b) or 767.451 (4) and the parent of a minor who has been adjudged to be in need of protection or services under s. 48.13 because of an action by the parent or the parent’s failure to act may not have the rights of a parent or guardian under this chapter with respect to access to that child’s patient health care records under s. 146.82 or 146.83.SB799,6Section 6. 252.15 (3m) (d) 1m. of the statutes is created to read:252.15 (3m) (d) 1m. Notwithstanding par. (c), to a parent or legal custodian of a minor who is 14 years of age or older, except for a parent described in s. 146.835. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb799 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb799 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB799 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB799 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»SB799: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting